Illinois, session 104th, HB1592.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Local Library Act is amended by 5changing Section 5-5 as follows: 6    (75 ILCS 5/5-5)  (from Ch. 81, par. 5-5)7    Sec. 5-5. When the board determines to commence the 8construction of the building or the remodeling, repairing or 9improving of an existing library building or the erection of 10an addition thereto, the purchase of the necessary equipment 11for such library, or the acquisition of library materials such 12as books, periodicals, recordings and electronic data storage 13and retrieval facilities in connection with either the 14purchase or construction of a new library building or the 15expansion of an existing library building, they may then 16revise the plan therefor or adopt a new plan and provide 17estimates of the costs thereof, and shall, when the cost is in 18excess of $35,000 $25,000, advertise for bids for the 19construction of the building, or the remodeling, repairing or 20improving of an existing library building or the erection of 21an addition thereto, or the purchase of the necessary 22equipment for such library, or the acquisition of library 23materials such as books, periodicals, recordings and   HB1592- 2 -LRB104 04960 RTM 14987 b1electronic data storage and retrieval facilities in connection 2with either the purchase or construction of a new library 3building or the expansion of an existing library building, and 4shall let the contract or contracts for the same, when the cost 5is in excess of $35,000 $25,000, to the lowest responsible 6bidder or bidders. 7    The board shall not be required to accept a bid that does 8not meet the library's established specifications, terms of 9delivery, quality, and serviceability requirements. Contracts 10which, by their nature, are not adapted to award by 11competitive bidding, are not subject to competitive bidding, 12including, but not limited to:13        (1) contracts for the services of individuals 14    possessing a high degree of professional skill where the 15    ability or fitness of the individual plays an important 16    part;17        (2) contracts for the printing of finance committee 18    reports and departmental reports;19        (3) contracts for the printing or engraving of bonds, 20    tax warrants and other evidences of indebtedness;21        (4) contracts for the maintenance or servicing of, or 22    provision of repair parts for, equipment which are made 23    with the manufacturer or authorized service agent of that 24    equipment where the provision of parts, maintenance, or 25    servicing can best be performed by the manufacturer or 26    authorized service agent;  HB1592- 3 -LRB104 04960 RTM 14987 b1        (5) purchases and contracts for the use, purchase, 2    delivery, movement, or installation of data processing 3    equipment, software, or services and telecommunications 4    and interconnect equipment, software, and services;5        (6) contracts for duplicating machines and supplies;6        (7) contracts for utility services such as water, 7    light, heat, telephone or telegraph;8        (8) contracts for goods or services procured from 9    another governmental agency;10        (9) purchases of equipment previously owned by some 11    entity other than the library itself; and12        (10) contracts for goods or services which are 13    economically procurable from only one source, such as for 14    the purchase of magazines, books, periodicals, pamphlets, 15    and reports. 16    Contracts for emergency expenditures are also exempt from 17competitive bidding when the emergency expenditure is approved 18by 3/4 of the members of the board. 19    The board shall require from such bidders security for the 20performance of the bids determined by the board pursuant to 21law. The board may let the contract or contracts to one or more 22bidders, as they shall determine.23(Source: P.A. 100-338, eff. 8-25-17.) 24    Section 10. The Public Library District Act of 1991 is 25amended by changing Section 40-45 as follows:   HB1592- 4 -LRB104 04960 RTM 14987 b1    (75 ILCS 16/40-45)2    Sec. 40-45. Bids for construction, improvements, or 3equipment purchases. 4    (a) When the trustees determine to commence constructing 5the building, purchasing a site or a building, remodeling, 6repairing, or improving an existing library building, erecting 7an addition to an existing library building, or purchasing the 8necessary equipment for the library, they may then revise the 9plan or adopt a new plan and provide estimates of the costs of 10the revised or new plan. 11    (b) The board shall, when the cost is in excess of $35,000 12$25,000, advertise for bids for constructing the building, 13remodeling, repairing, or improving of an existing library 14building, erecting an addition to an existing library 15building, or purchasing the necessary equipment for the 16library and shall let the contract or contracts for the 17project, when the cost is in excess of $35,000 $25,000, to the 18lowest responsible bidder or bidders. The board shall not be 19required to accept a bid that does not meet the library's 20established specifications, terms of delivery, quality, and 21serviceability requirements. Contracts which, by their nature, 22are not adapted to award by competitive bidding, are not 23subject to competitive bidding, including, but not limited to: 24        (1) contracts for the services of individuals 25    possessing a high degree of professional skill where the   HB1592- 5 -LRB104 04960 RTM 14987 b1    ability or fitness of the individual plays an important 2    part;3        (2) contracts for the printing of finance committee 4    reports and departmental reports;5        (3) contracts for the printing or engraving of bonds, 6    tax warrants and other evidences of indebtedness;7        (4) contracts for the maintenance or servicing of, or 8    provision of repair parts for, equipment which are made 9    with the manufacturer or authorized service agent of that 10    equipment where the provision of parts, maintenance, or 11    servicing can best be performed by the manufacturer or 12    authorized service agent;13        (5) purchases and contracts for the use, purchase, 14    delivery, movement, or installation of data processing 15    equipment, software, or services and telecommunications 16    and interconnect equipment, software, and services;17        (6) contracts for duplicating machines and supplies;18        (7) contracts for utility services such as water, 19    light, heat, telephone or telegraph;20        (8) contracts for goods or services procured from 21    another governmental agency;22        (9) purchases of equipment previously owned by some 23    entity other than the library itself; and24        (10) contracts for goods or services which are 25    economically procurable from only one source, such as for 26    the purchase of magazines, books, periodicals, pamphlets,   HB1592- 6 -LRB104 04960 RTM 14987 b1    and reports.2    Contracts for emergency expenditures are also exempt from 3competitive bidding when the emergency expenditure is approved 4by 3/4 of the members of the board. 5    The board shall require from the bidders security for the 6performance of the bids determined by the board pursuant to 7law. The trustees may let the contract or contracts to one or 8more bidders as they determine.9(Source: P.A. 100-338, eff. 8-25-17.) 10    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 11becoming law.